Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 16 Kent County Water District

39-16-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter the following definitions shall apply:

“Authority” means the corporation created by §

39-16-3

.

“Board” means the members of the authority.

“Bonds” means the bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the authority pursuant to this chapter.

“District” means the Kent County water district.

“Property” means any or all of the properties of any water supply and distribution system or part thereof, including plants, works, and instrumentalities, and all properties used or useful in connection therewith, and all parts thereof and all appurtenances thereto, including lands, easements, rights in land and water rights, rights-of-way, contract rights, franchises, approaches, connections, dams, reservoirs, water mains and pipelines, pumping stations and equipment, or any other property incidental to and included in the system or part thereof situated within or without the district.

“Treasurer” means the treasurer of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-1

; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 9.

39-16-2.
District created.

There is hereby created a district to be known as the Kent County water district, whose boundaries shall be coterminous with the boundaries of Kent County. Notwithstanding any finding by any court to the contrary, the Kent County water district shall be a political subdivision of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-2

; P.L. 1990, ch. 16, § 1.

39-16-3.
Board created.

A board to be known as the Kent County Water Authority is hereby created. The powers of the public benefit corporation shall be vested in and exercised by a majority of the members of the board then in office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-3

; P.L. 1990, ch. 16, § 1.

39-16-4.
Composition of board.

The board shall consist of seven (7) members, one member to be appointed by the town council of East Greenwich and two (2) members by the city council of the city of Warwick, and two (2) members each appointed by the town councils of the towns of Coventry and West Warwick. The successors of members shall be appointed by their respective city and town councils. A majority of the governing body appointing a member may remove the member for willful misconduct.

The members of the board shall appoint a member to serve as chair of the board, and the appointment shall be made at the board’s first meeting after the effective date of this section. The chair appointed shall serve for a seven-year (7) term, at which time the board shall appoint a new chair. If a chair is unable to complete their term, a new chair shall be appointed to serve a seven-year (7) term.

Each member shall serve for a term of seven (7) years, except that all vacancies occurring during a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. A member shall hold office until his or her successor has been duly appointed and has qualified. Each member of the authority shall take an oath to administer the duties of his or her office faithfully and impartially, and the oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

Four (4) members of the authority shall constitute a quorum and the vote of four (4) members shall be necessary for any action taken by the authority. No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority.

In the event of a vacancy occurring in the board by reason of the death, resignation, or removal for willful misconduct of a member, the governing body of the town or city that appointed the member shall appoint a new member for the unexpired term.

In the month of January, the board shall make an annual report to the town councils of East Greenwich, West Warwick, and Coventry, and to the city council of Warwick, of its activities for the preceding fiscal year. Each report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operations during the year. The authority shall cause an annual audit of the books, records, and accounts of the authority to be made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-4

; P.L. 1981, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 283, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 297, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 26.

39-16-5.
Officers and employees of board.

The chairperson of the board shall be selected by the majority vote of the members of the board. The board shall appoint a secretary and a treasurer, who may or may not be a member of the board, and other employees as may be necessary in its judgment, and fix their compensation. The board may provide, in the fixing of compensation, for a retirement program, commonly known as a pension plan, funded by individual or group insurance or annuity contracts or otherwise, for health and accident insurance, for life insurance, for hospital service commonly known as blue cross, and for physicians’ service for any one or more or all of its employees; and the board is hereby authorized to expend the moneys of the authority for purposes and programs as it may deem advisable. These programs and purposes may be financed in full or in part by the moneys of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-5

; P.L. 1962, ch. 41, § 1.

39-16-6.
Compensation of members and agents.

Each member of the board shall receive an annual salary not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) per year, and shall be entitled to reimbursement of his or her actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his or her official duties. The salaries, compensation, and expenses of all members, officers, employees, and agents shall be paid solely out of the funds of the authority. No part of the earnings of the authority shall inure to the benefit of any private person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3592, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-6

; P.L. 1969, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 16, § 1.

39-16-7.
Business prohibited to members.

No member of the authority shall directly or indirectly engage in any contract or agreement for labor or for the supply of materials for construction or reconstruction of the physical assets of the authority or replacements or additions thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3592, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-7

.

39-16-8.
Powers of authority.

The authority shall have power:

To acquire property by voluntary purchase from the owner or owners thereof; and if the authority deems it advisable, to acquire any of the properties through the purchase of stock and obligations of a corporation owning the property and the dissolution of the corporation. The owner or owners of any property that the authority is herein authorized to acquire are hereby authorized to sell or otherwise transfer the same to the authority, and in the case of a sale or other transfer of property pursuant to this provision it shall be lawful to dissolve the corporation, any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding.

To own and operate, maintain, repair, improve, enlarge, and extend, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, any property acquired hereunder all of which, together with the acquisition of the property, are hereby declared to be public purposes.

To produce, distribute, and sell water within or without the territorial limits of the district.

To sue and be sued.

To adopt and alter a corporate seal.

To acquire, hold, use, lease, sell, transfer, and dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed, or interest therein for its corporate purposes, and to mortgage, pledge, or lease any such property; provided, however, that in the case of any sale or proposed sale of any real property hereunder, the authority shall first grant to the city or town in which the real property, or any part thereof, is situated the right to purchase the real property, or portion thereof situated within its boundaries, upon the same terms and conditions as the authority offers or proposes to offer to any other prospective purchaser.

To make bylaws for the management and regulation of its affairs.

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes, including the creation and maintenance of working capital, and to issue negotiable bonds, notes, or other obligations, and to fund or refund the same.

To fix rates and collect charges for the use of the facilities of or services rendered by or any commodities furnished by the authority, such as to provide revenues sufficient at all times to pay, as the same shall become due, the principal and interest on the bonds of the authority, together with the maintenance of proper reserves therefor, in addition to paying, as the same shall become due, the expense of operating and maintaining the properties of the authority, together with proper reserves for depreciation, maintenance, and contingencies and all other obligations and indebtedness of the authority. The authority shall charge any city, county, or town for the use of any facility of or service rendered by or any commodities furnished to it by the authority at rates applicable to other users taking similar service.

To contract in its own name for any lawful purpose that would effectuate the provisions of this chapter; to execute all instruments necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted by this chapter; provided, however, that the full faith, credit, and taxing power of the state or of any city, county, town, or other political subdivision shall never be pledged, nor shall any bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness of the authority constitute the obligation of the state or of any city, county, town, or other political subdivision, but shall be solely the obligation of the authority. It is the intention of the legislature that any property acquired by the authority pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be financed as a self-liquidating enterprise, and that any indebtedness incurred by the authority shall be payable solely from the earnings or revenues derived from all or part of the property acquired by the authority.

To enter into cooperative agreements with cities, counties, towns, or water companies within or without the district for the interconnection of facilities or for any other lawful corporate purposes necessary or desirable to effect the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-8

; P.L. 1971, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 16, § 1.

39-16-9.
Application of public utility law — Rate determination.

Notwithstanding the proviso contained in the definition of “public utility” in §

39-1-2

, chapters 1 — 5 of this title shall apply to the water district created by this chapter and to the governing body thereof, and notwithstanding anything contained in this chapter with respect to fixing rates and collecting charges, rates and charges of the district and/or authority shall be established in accordance with and subject to the provisions of chapters 1 — 5. Until so established, the rates and charges that were in effect at the time when the authority acquired properties pursuant to the provisions of §

39-16-8

, shall continue in full force and effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2876, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-9

.

39-16-10.
Power to issue bonds — Pledge of revenues.

The authority shall have the power and is hereby authorized from time to time to issue its negotiable bonds for any of its corporate purposes and to secure the payment of the bonds as may be provided in the resolution or resolutions authorizing the bonds. Except as may be otherwise expressly provided by the authority, every issue of bonds by the authority shall be general obligations payable out of any moneys, earnings, or revenues of the authority, subject only to any agreements with the holders of particular bonds pledging any particular moneys, earnings, or revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-10

.

39-16-11.
Terms and sale of bonds — Refunding.

The authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance, at one time or from time to time, of revenue bonds of the authority for the purpose of paying all or part of the cost to acquire, construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate, improve, or maintain any property necessary or desirable for the purposes of the authority. The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the board, and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from their date, bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such time or times, be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges and such privileges of reconversion from registered to coupon form, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places and be subject to redemption at such premium, if required, and on such terms, as the resolution may provide. Notwithstanding the requirement of §

39-16-8

that any indebtedness incurred by the authority shall be payable solely from the earnings or revenues derived from all or part of the property acquired by the authority, the authority may purchase, or otherwise acquire, or require bond insurance, letters of credit, lines of credit, or such other instruments or securities to ensure the timely payment of principal, interest, and/or redemption premium on the bonds.

Pending the preparation of the bonds in definitive form, the board shall have the power to issue temporary bonds or interim receipts in such form as the board may elect. The definitive bonds shall be signed by the chairperson of the authority or a facsimile thereof shall be impressed or imprinted thereon and attested by the manual or facsimile signature of the secretary of the authority, and any coupons attached to the bonds shall bear the facsimile signature of the chairperson of the authority. In case any officer whose signature or facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds, the signature or the facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he or she had remained in office until delivery.

Any bonds, authorized by and issued pursuant to this chapter, may be sold at public or private sale for such price or prices as the authority shall determine.

The authority is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of refunding bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding that shall have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon or interest accrued or to accrue to the earliest or subsequent date of redemption purchase or maturity of the bonds and, if deemed advisable by the authority, for the additional purpose of paying all or part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating, or improving any property of the authority. The proceeds of bonds or notes issued for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds or notes may be applied, in the discretion of the authority, to the purchase, retirement at maturity, or redemption of the outstanding bonds or notes, either on their earliest or a subsequent redemption date, and may, pending that application, be placed in escrow. Any escrowed proceeds may be invested and reinvested in obligations of or guaranteed by the United States, or in certificates of deposit, time deposits, or repurchase agreements fully secured or guaranteed by the state or the United States, or an instrumentality of either, maturing at such time or times as shall be appropriate to ensure the prompt payment, as to principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds or notes to be so refunded. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of the proceeds and interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments thereof, may be returned to the authority for use by it in furtherance of its purposes. The portion of the proceeds of bonds or notes issued for the additional purpose of paying all or part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating, developing, or improving any property of the authority may be invested and reinvested in such obligations, securities, and other investments consistent with this section as shall be specified in the resolutions under which the bonds are authorized and that shall mature not later than the times when the proceeds will be needed for these purposes. The interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments may be applied to the payment of all parts of the costs, or may be used by the authority otherwise in furtherance of its purposes. The issuance of the bonds, the maturities, and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the authority in respect to the bonds shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter insofar as the provisions may be applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-11

; P.L. 1981, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 118.

39-16-12.
Covenants permissible in bond resolution.

Any resolution or resolutions authorizing any bonds or any issue of bonds may contain provisions that shall be a part of the contract with the holders of the bonds thereby authorized, as to:

Pledging all or any part of the money, earnings, income, and revenues derived from all or any part of the property of the authority to secure the payment of any bonds or of any issue of bonds subject to such agreements with bondholders as may then exist;

The rates to be fixed and the charges to be collected and the amounts to be raised in each year, and the use and disposition of the earnings and other revenues;

The setting aside of reserves and the creation of sinking funds and the regulation and disposition thereof;

Limitations on the right of the authority to restrict and regulate the use of the properties in connection with which the bonds are issued;

Limitations on the purposes to which the proceeds of sale of any issue of bonds may be applied;

Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, including refunding bonds and the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which consent may be given;

The creation of special funds into which any earnings or revenues of the authority may be deposited, and the investment of the funds;

The appointment of a fiscal agent and the determination of its powers and duties;

Limitations on the power of the authority to sell or otherwise dispose of its properties;

The preparation of annual budgets by the authority and the employment of consulting engineers and auditors;

The rights and remedies of bondholders in the event of failure on the part of the authority to perform any agreement;

Covenanting that as long as any bonds are outstanding the authority shall use its best efforts to establish and maintain its rates and charges adequate at all times to pay and provide for all operating expenses of the authority, all payments of principal, redemption premium, if any, and interest on bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness of or assumed by the authority, all renewals, repairs, or replacements to the property of the authority deemed necessary, and all other amounts that the authority may by law, resolution, or contract be obligated to pay. On or before the last day of the authority’s fiscal year, the authority shall review the adequacy of its rates and charges to satisfy the above requirements for the next succeeding fiscal year. If the review indicates that the rates and charges are, or are likely to be, insufficient to meet the requirements of this chapter, the authority shall promptly take such steps as are permitted by law and as are necessary to cure or avoid the deficiency, including but limited to, making an emergency request to the public utilities commission to raise its rates and charges;

Any other matters, of like or different character that in any way affect the security or protection of the bonds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-12

; P.L. 1990, ch. 16, § 1.

39-16-13.
Tax exemption.

It is hereby declared that the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes is in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state and for the improvement of their health, welfare, and prosperity, and the authority will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred by this chapter, and the state covenants with the holders of the bonds that the authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments or sums in lieu of taxes, except as provided in §

39-16-14

, to the state or any political subdivision thereof upon any of the property acquired by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the operation and maintenance of the property or upon any earnings, revenues, moneys, or other income derived by the authority, and that the bonds of the authority and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-13

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 118.

39-16-14.
Payments in lieu of taxes.

The authority shall pay annually, having first made provision for the payment of principal and interest on any bonds outstanding and any other charges payable from revenues due in such year as may be provided in the resolution or resolutions authorizing any bonds, in lieu of any property tax, as a charge upon its earnings or revenues, to each city, town, or district, a sum equal in amount to any property tax levied on any property by or on behalf of the city, town, or district during the year next preceding the acquisition of such property by the authority. The authority shall have no power to levy or collect ad valorem property taxes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-14

.

39-16-15.
Pledge not to alter rights of authority.

The state does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of the bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness of the authority that the state will not limit or alter rights hereby vested in the authority until the bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, together with interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installment of interest and all costs and expenses in connection with any actions or proceedings by or on behalf of the bondholders, are fully met and discharged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-15

.

39-16-16.
Bonds as legal investments.

The bonds are hereby made securities in which all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions; all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business; all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking business; all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries; and all other persons, whomsoever, who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest funds including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds are also hereby made securities that may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state, and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions, for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of this state is now or may hereafter be authorized.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-16

.

39-16-17.
Money of authority.

All money of the authority, from whatever source derived, shall be paid to the treasurer of the authority. The money on receipt shall be deposited forthwith in a separate bank account or accounts. The money in the accounts shall be paid out on check of the treasurer, on requisition by the authority, or of such other person or persons as the authority may authorize to make the requisitions. All deposits of money shall be secured by obligations of the United States, or of the state, of a market value equal at all times to the amount of deposits, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give security for the deposits. The authority shall have power, notwithstanding the provisions of this section, to contract with the holders of any of its bonds as to the custody, collection, security, investment, and payment of any money of the authority, or any money held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds or in any way to secure bonds, and to carry out any contract notwithstanding that the contract may be inconsistent with the previous provisions of this section. Money held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds or in any way to secure bonds and deposits of money may be secured in the same manner as money of the authority, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give security for the deposits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-17

.

39-16-18.
Right to alter, amend, or repeal chapter.

The right to alter, amend, or repeal this chapter is hereby expressly reserved, but no such alteration, amendment, or repeal shall operate to impair the obligation of any contract made by the authority under any power conferred by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-18

.

39-16-19.
Severability.

If any section, clause, provision, or term of this chapter shall be declared unconstitutional and ineffective in whole or in part, then to the extent that it is not unconstitutional and ineffective it shall be valid and effective and no other section, clause, provision, or term shall on account thereof be deemed invalid or ineffective.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1740, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

39-16-19

.

39-16-20.
Supplementary powers.

The authority, in addition to any other powers granted in this chapter, has the following powers in order to assist it in setting rates:

To conduct examinations and hearings and to hear testimony and take proof, under oath or affirmation, at public or private hearings, on any matter material for its information and necessary to carry out the terms of this chapter;

To issue subpoenas, necessary to carry out the terms of this chapter, requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers pertinent to any hearing before the authority, or before one or more of the members of the authority appointed by it to conduct the hearing; and

To apply to any court, having territorial jurisdiction of the offense, to have punished for contempt any witness who refuses to obey a subpoena, or who refuses to be sworn or affirmed to testify, or who is guilty of any contempt after summons to appear.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 16, § 2.

39-16-21.
Transfer on dissolution.

If the authority shall be dissolved, all funds of the authority, not required for the payment of bonds or other debts of the authority, the disposition of which is not otherwise governed by contracts to which the authority may be party, shall be paid to the towns of East Greenwich, Coventry, and West Warwick and the city of Warwick and, except as provided in this chapter, all property belonging to the authority shall be vested in the above-mentioned municipalities and delivered to them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 16, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 118.

39-16-22.
Notes.

The authority may, by resolution, authorize the issue from time to time of interest bearing or discounted notes in anticipation of the issue of bonds. Temporary notes issued under this section shall be signed by the chairperson and the treasurer of the authority and shall be payable within five (5) years of their respective dates, but the principal of and interest on notes issued for a shorter period may be renewed or paid from time to time by the issue of other notes under this section, provided the period from the date of the original note to the maturity of any note issued to renew or pay the same debt or the interest thereon shall not exceed five (5) years. All other terms and conditions of the notes shall be set by the authority in the resolution authorizing issuance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 16, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 118.